trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
    <pardef n="vos__prn">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vosotr/os__prn">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="~la__det">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e r="RL" lm="el"><p><l><a/>la</l><r>el</r></p><par n="~la__det"/></e>
      <e lm="vosotros"><i>vosotr</i><par n="vosotr/os__prn"/></e>
